District of Columbia statutes.
1-303.04

Building regulations.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to make and the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to enforce such building regulations for the said District as the Council may deem advisable.

(b)

Such rules and regulations made as above provided shall have the same force and effect within the District of Columbia as if enacted by Congress.

June 14, 1878, 20 Stat. 131, ch. 194, §§ 1, 2
Electricity, authority of Council to make rules respecting production, use, and control, see § 2-131.
Plumbing and drainage, maintenance of house and public sewers, regulations governing, see §§ 2-135 and 2-135.
This section is referenced in § 1-303.05.
1981 Ed., § 1-322.
1973 Ed., § 1-228.
New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1982: The “Enclosed Sidewalk Cafe Act of 1982” (D.C. Law 4-148, Sept. 17, 1982, 29 DCR 3361).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(5) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.